Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 3 Taxes and Fees
57-4-306. Distribution of collections.

All gross receipt taxes collected under § 57-4-301(c) shall be distributed by the commissioner of revenue as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) to the general fund to be earmarked for education purposes; and

The other fifty percent (50%) to be distributed to local political subdivisions as follows:

Collections for privileges exercised in an incorporated municipality shall be distributed by the commissioner to the city recorder; and

Collections for privileges exercised in an unincorporated area of the county shall be distributed by the commissioner to the county trustee.

The proceeds received by a local political subdivision pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) must be distributed by the local political subdivision in the following manner:

One-half (½) of the proceeds must be distributed as follows:

If the county school system is the only LEA in the county, then to the county trustee for the county school system from the collection of taxes in the county or any city exercising the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c);

If a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and operates a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school system, then to the city recorder, who shall retain the collections for the city school system;

If a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and operates a city school system that is not a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school system, then to the city recorder:

In the amount the percentage that the prior year's average daily attendance (ADA) of the students in the city school system is to the prior year's ADA of public school students residing in the city who attend either the city school system or the county school system with the remaining amount distributed to the county trustee for the county school system, if the city lies entirely in a single county; or

In the amount the percentage that the prior year's ADA of the students in the city school system is to the prior year's ADA of public school students residing in the city who attend either the city school system or a county school system with the remaining amount divided between the counties based on where the tax was collected and distributed to the county trustees for the county school systems, if the city lies within two (2) or more counties;

Notwithstanding § 49-3-315, if a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), but does not operate a city school system, then to the county trustee for the county school system;

If a special school district lies, in whole or in part, within a city that exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), then to the appropriate official acting for the special school district in the amount the percentage the ADA of public school students residing in the city and attending the special school district is to the total ADA of city public school students who attend either the special school district or the county school system with any remaining amount distributed to the county trustee for the county school system;

Notwithstanding § 49-3-315, if a county exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and one (1) or more city school systems operate within the county, then to the county trustee for the county school system any tax revenues collected outside the boundaries of cities exercising the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) that have city school systems; or

If a city that lies in two (2) or more counties exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) but does not operate a city school system, then tax revenues collected in the city must be divided between the counties based on where the tax was collected and distributed to the county trustees for the county school systems;

The other one-half (½) of the proceeds must be distributed as follows:

Collections of gross receipts collected in unincorporated areas, to the county general fund; and

Collections of gross receipts in incorporated cities and towns, to the city or town wherein such tax is collected; and

As used in subdivision (b)(1), “average daily attendance” or “ADA” means:

If the school system was in operation during the prior school year, the aggregate days' attendance of the school system during the prior school year divided by the number of days school was in session during the prior school year; or

If the school system was not in operation during the prior school year, then the estimated expected attendance of the school system for the current school year as reported to the department of education.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(2), the fifty percent (50%) of the gross receipt taxes allocated to local political subdivisions by subdivision (a)(2) and collected in a municipality which is a premier tourist resort shall be distributed to and expended by such municipality for schools in such municipality.

By August 1, 2014, every city or county that exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) shall provide written notice to each school system operating within its jurisdiction. This notice shall contain a statement that the local political subdivision exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), a statement that students within the jurisdiction attend a school or schools operated by the school system, a statement that the school system is authorized to receive a portion of the revenues collected, and a reference to this part. A city or county that, subsequent to July 1, 2014, elects to exercise the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), shall comply with the notice provisions of this subsection (e) within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the referendum.

If the local political subdivision fails to remit the proceeds to the appropriate school fund, system, or systems as required under subsection (b) within sixty (60) days of receipt from the commissioner, then the aggrieved local school board shall notify the comptroller of the treasury who shall deliver by certified mail a written notice of such failure to the local political subdivision within five (5) business days of notice of the failure.

In the event the local political subdivision fails to remit the proceeds within thirty (30) days of the receipt of such notice, the comptroller of the treasury shall direct the commissioner to withhold future distributions of proceeds to the local political subdivision authorized under subsection (b) until a final determination is made pursuant to subsection (h).

Upon the commissioner withholding distributions of proceeds as authorized under subsection (g), an aggrieved local school board shall have the authority to pursue equitable relief against the local political subdivision in the chancery court; provided, however, that in the event that the state is a party or becomes a party to the suit, then such suit shall be filed or transferred to the chancery court of Davidson County. Upon receipt of a copy of the final judgment of the court, the commissioner shall distribute all withheld proceeds to the local political subdivision, which shall remit such proceeds to the aggrieved party pursuant to the judgment. If the amount of the judgment is not satisfied by the withheld proceeds, then the local political subdivision shall be solely responsible for remitting future proceeds to the aggrieved party pursuant to the judgment.

Subsections (a)-(h) shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census of:

not less than nor more than

336,400 336,500

98,900 99,000

In such counties, all gross receipt taxes collected under §57-4-301(c) shall be distributed by the commissioner of revenue as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) to the general fund to be earmarked for education purposes; and

The other fifty percent (50%) to be distributed to local political subdivisions as follows:

Collections for privileges exercised in an incorporated municipality shall be distributed by the commissioner to the city recorder; and

Collections for privileges exercised in an unincorporated area of the county shall be distributed by the commissioner to the county trustee.

The proceeds received in each local political subdivision pursuant to subdivision (i)(1)(B) shall be distributed by the local political subdivision in the following manner:

One-half (½) of the proceeds shall be expended and distributed in the same manner as the county property tax for schools is expended and distributed; any proceeds expended and distributed to municipalities which do not operate their own school systems separate from the county are required to remit one-half (½) of their proceeds of the gross receipts liquor-by-the-drink tax to the county school fund; and

The other one-half (½) of the proceeds shall be distributed as follows:

Collections of gross receipts collected in unincorporated areas, to the county general fund; and

Collections of gross receipts in incorporated cities and towns, to the city or town wherein such tax is collected.

[Effective until July 1, 2023.]

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, fifty percent (50%) of the event revenue from gross receipt taxes collected under § 57-4-301(c) for privileges exercised in an event venue during an event period that would not otherwise be earmarked for educational purposes shall be deposited in the event tourism fund.

One and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%) of funds deposited in the event tourism fund shall be retained by the department of finance and administration to be used for costs associated with administering the fund and this section. The department of finance and administration shall cause to be paid to the department of revenue an amount to offset the department's costs in administering this section.

As used in this subsection (j):

“Event period” has the same meaning as defined in § 67-6-105;

“Event revenue” has the same meaning as defined in § 67-6-105; and

“Event venue” has the same meaning as defined in § 67-6-105.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-162; Acts 1982, ch. 942, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 356, § 1; 2003, ch. 355, § 19; 2005, ch. 500, § 2; 2006, ch. 989, § 7; 2014, ch. 901, § 1; 2015, ch. 220, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 885, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 346, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 687, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 959, § 2; 2019, ch. 194, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 696, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Acts 2006, ch. 989, § 17 provided that the act, which deleted former subdivisions (4) and (5), shall apply to funds remitted to the department of revenue on or after August 1, 2006.

For the Preamble to the act concerning a mechanism by which a sponsoring county or municipality and event venue may receive reimbursement for certain event-related expenses out of the sales tax revenues generated in connection with a qualified event, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 959.

Acts 2018, ch. 959, § 4 provided that the provisions contained in the act, which added subsection (j), shall terminate on July 1, 2023.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 687 in (b), substituted “2016-2017” for “2015-2016” throughout (b)(1), substituted “From July 1, 2017, until June 30, 2018,” for “From July 1, 2016, until June 30, 2017,” at the beginning of (b)(1), substituted “2017-2018” for “2016-2017 throughout (b)(2), substituted “From July 1, 2018, until June 30, 2019,” for “From July 1, 2017, until June 30, 2018,” at the beginning of (b)(2); and substituted “After July 1, 2019” for “After July 1, 2018” at the beginning of the introductory language of (c).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 959, effective on January 1, 2019 and effective until July 1, 2023, added (j). See the Compiler's Notes.

The 2019 amendment, substituted “2017-2018” for “2016-2017”, “2018-2019” for “2017-2018” and “2019-2020” for “2018-2019” throughout subsection (b); in (b)(1), substituted “July 1, 2018 until June 30, 2019” for “July 1, 2017 until June 30, 2018” and substituted “must” for “shall” in (b)(1), (b)(1)(A)(vii), (b)(1)(B), (b)(1)(B)(ii), and (b)(2)(A)(vii); in (b)(1)(A)(ii) substituted “then to the city recorder, who shall retain” for “then the city recorder shall retain”; in (b)(2)(A)(vi), inserted “Notwithstanding §49-3-315, if a county exercises the privilege authorized under §57-4-301(c)” at the beginning; substituted “After July 1, 2020” for “After July 1, 2019” at the beginning of (c).

The 2020 amendment rewrote (b), which read; “(b) From July 1, 2018, until June 30, 2019, the proceeds received by a local political subdivision pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) must be distributed by the local political subdivision in the following manner:“(A) One-half (½) of the proceeds must be distributed as follows:“(i) If the county school system is the only LEA in the county, then to the county trustee for the county school system from the collection of taxes in the county or any city exercising the privilege authorized under §57-4-301(c);“(ii) If a city exercises the privilege authorized under §57-4-301(c) and operates a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school system, then to the city recorder, who shall retain the collections for the city school system;“(iii) If a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and operates a city school system that is not a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school system, then to the city recorder:“(a ) In the amount the percentage that the 2017-2018 average daily attendance (ADA) of the students in the city school system is to the 2017-2018 ADA of public school students residing in the city who attend either the city school system or the county school system with the remaining amount distributed to the county trustee for the county school system, if the city lies entirely in a single county; or“(b ) In the amount the percentage that the 2017-2018 ADA of the students in the city school system is to the 2017-2018 ADA of public-school students residing in the city who attend either the city school system or a county school system with the remaining amount divided between the counties based on where the tax was collected and distributed to the county trustees for the county school systems, if the city lies within two (2) or more counties;“(iv) Notwithstanding §49-3-315, if a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), but does not operate a city school system, then to the county trustee for the county school system;“(v) If a special school district lies, in whole or in part, within a city that exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), then to the appropriate official acting for the special school district in the amount the percentage the ADA of public-school students residing in the city and attending the special school district is to the total ADA of city public-school students who attend either the special school district or the county school system with any remaining amount distributed to the county trustee for the county school system;“(vi) Notwithstanding §49-3-315, if a county exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and one (1) or more city school systems operate within the county, then to the county trustee for the county school system any tax revenues collected outside the boundaries of cities exercising the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) that have city school systems; or“(vii) If a city that lies in two (2) or more counties exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) but does not operate a city school system, then tax revenues collected in the city must be divided between the counties based on where the tax was collected and distributed to the county trustees for the county school systems; and“(B) The other one-half (½) of the proceeds must be distributed as follows:“(i) Collections of gross receipts collected in unincorporated areas, to the county general fund; and“(ii) Collections of gross receipts in incorporated cities and towns, to the city or town wherein such tax is collected.“(2) From July 1, 2019, until June 30, 2020, the proceeds received by a local political subdivision pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) must be distributed by the local political subdivision in the following manner:“(A) One-half (½) of the proceeds must be distributed as follows:“(i) If the county school system is the only LEA in the county, then to the county trustee for the county school system from the collection of taxes in the county or any city exercising the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c);“(ii) If a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and operates a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school system, then the city recorder shall retain the collections for the city school system;“(iii) If a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and operates a city school system that is not a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) school system, then to the city recorder:“(a ) In the amount the percentage that the 2018-2019 average daily attendance (ADA) of the students in the city school system is to the 2018-2019 ADA of public school students residing in the city who attend either the city school system or the county school system with the remaining amount distributed to the county trustee for the county school system, if the city lies entirely in a single county; or“(b ) In the amount the percentage that the 2018-2019 ADA of the students in the city school system is to the 2018-2019 ADA of public school students residing in the city who attend either the city school system or a county school system with the remaining amount divided between the counties based on where the tax was collected and distributed to the county trustees for the county school systems, if the city lies within two (2) or more counties;“(iv) Notwithstanding § 49-3-315, if a city exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), but does not operate a city school system, then to the county trustee for the county school system;“(v) If a special school district lies, in whole or in part, within a city that exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c), then to the appropriate official acting for the special school district in the amount the percentage the ADA of public school students residing in the city and attending the special school district is to the total ADA of city public school students who attend either the special school district or the county school system with any remaining amount distributed to the county trustee for the county school system;“(vi) Notwithstanding § 49-3-315, if a county exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) and one (1) or more city school systems operate within the county, then to the county trustee for the county school system any tax revenues collected outside the boundaries of cities exercising the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) that have city school systems; or“(vii) If a city that lies in two (2) or more counties exercises the privilege authorized under § 57-4-301(c) but does not operate a city school system, then tax revenues collected in the city must be divided between the counties based on where the tax was collected and distributed to the county trustees for the county school systems; and“(B) The other one-half (½) of the proceeds shall be distributed as follows:“(i) Collections of gross receipts collected in unincorporated areas, to the county general fund; and“(ii) Collections of gross receipts in incorporated cities and towns, to the city or town wherein such tax is collected.“(3)(A) As used in subdivision (b)(1), “average daily attendance” or “ADA” means:“(i) If the school system was in operation during the 2017-2018 school year, the aggregate days' attendance of the school system during the 2017-2018 school year divided by the number of days school was in session during the 2017-2018 school year; or“(ii) If the school system was not in operation during the 2017-2018 school year, then the estimated expected attendance of the school system for the 2018-2019 school year as reported to the department of education.“(B) As used in subdivision (b)(2), “average daily attendance” or “ADA” means:“(i) If the school system was in operation during the 2018-2019 school year, the aggregate days' attendance of the school system during the 2018-2019 school year divided by the number of days school was in session during the 2018-2019 school year; or“(ii) If the school system was not in operation during the 2018-2019 school year, then the estimated expected attendance of the school system for the 2019-2020 school year as reported to the department of education.”; deleted (c), which read; “(c) After July 1, 2020, the proceeds received in each local political subdivision pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) shall be distributed by the local political subdivision in the following manner:“(1) One-half (½) of the proceeds shall be expended and distributed in the same manner as the county property tax for schools is expended and distributed; any proceeds expended and distributed to municipalities which do not operate their own school systems separate from the county are required to remit one-half (½) of their proceeds of the gross receipts liquor-by-the-drink tax to the county school fund; and“(2) The other one-half (½) of the proceeds shall be distributed as follows:“(A) Collections of gross receipts collected in unincorporated areas, to the county general fund; and“(B) Collections of gross receipts in incorporated cities and towns, to the city or town wherein such tax is collected.” and in (f) and (g) substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsections (b) or (c) as applicable”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 687, § 3. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 959, § 4. January 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 194, § 3. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 696, § 5, July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Changes in municipal boundaries, effect upon receipt and distribution of tax revenues, §6-51-115.

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of tax proceeds in City of Columbia, OAG 94-72 (6/2/94).

Distribution of tax proceeds in Bedford County, OAG 97-143 (10/23/97).

The state can probably continue to distribute state-shared taxes even if the General Assembly does not enact a general appropriations act, OAG 00-083 (5/4/00).

Authority of county school board to compromise or forgive liquor-by-the-drink tax revenue. OAG 14-22, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (2/26/14).

57-4-307. Damaged or unaccepted goods — Liability for tax.

When any common carrier transporting alcoholic beverages to a point within this state, or any insurance company insuring such alcoholic beverages, comes into possession of such alcoholic beverages by virtue of the same being damaged or otherwise unaccepted by the consignee of such alcoholic beverages, such common carrier or insurance company shall become liable for the tax imposed under this chapter, unless proof deemed satisfactory to the commissioner is furnished to the commissioner by such carrier or insurer showing that such alcoholic beverages have been destroyed or shipped to a point without this state and, therefore, have not been sold or consumed in this state.

Acts 1971, ch. 150, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-169.

57-4-308. Violation a misdemeanor.

Any violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor and punishable as such.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-163.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-114,40-35-110,40-35-111.